Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2622
Insurance consultant's license; examination.

All individual applicants for licensure under sections 44-2606 to 44-2635 shall be examined by the director in such manner and form as the director prescribes. The applicant shall pass the examination with a grade determined by the director to indicate satisfactory knowledge and understanding of the area of insurance for which the applicant seeks qualification as a consultant.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 17;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 209.